Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.486

Members—Dissenters' notice—Requirement.

(1) If the plan of merger is approved, the limited liability company shall deliver a written dissenters' notice to all members who satisfied the requirements of RCW 25.15.481.

(2) The dissenters' notice required by RCW 25.15.476(2) or by subsection (1) of this section must be sent within ten days after the approval of the plan of merger, and must:

(a) State where the payment demand must be sent;

(b) Inform members as to the extent transfer of the member's interest in the limited liability company will be restricted as permitted by RCW 25.15.496 after the payment demand is received;

(c) Supply a form for demanding payment;

(d) Set a date by which the limited liability company must receive the payment demand, which date may not be fewer than thirty nor more than sixty days after the date the notice under this section is delivered; and

(e) Be accompanied by a copy of this article.

[ 2015 c 188 s 93.]